North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-06.3 Uniform Determination of Death Act

23-06.3-01.
Determination of death.

An individual who has sustained either irreversible cessation of circulatory and respiratory functions or irreversible cessation of all functions of the entire brain, including the brain stem, is dead. A determination of death must be made in accordance with accepted medical standards.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 308, § 1.

Comparative Legislation.

Jurisdictions enacting the Uniform Determination of Death Act include:

Alabama Alaska Arkansas California Colorado Delaware District of Columbia Georgia Idaho Indiana Kansas Maine Maryland Michigan Minnesota Mississippi Missouri Montana Nebraska Nevada New Hampshire New Jersey New Mexico New York North Dakota Ohio Oklahoma Oregon Pennsylvania Rhode Island South Carolina South Dakota Tennessee U.S. Virgin Islands Utah Vermont West Virginia Wisconsin Wyoming

Click to view

23-06.3-02.
Notice to family in case of imminent death.

If it appears to a physician who has primary responsibility for the treatment and care of an individual that the death of the individual is imminent, the physician shall make reasonable efforts to notify the individual’s next of kin. If after making reasonable efforts the next of kin are not notified, the physician shall document in the medical records of the individual the efforts made to notify the next of kin. If notice is given, the physician shall provide the next of kin with appropriate information regarding the individual’s medical condition and available medical therapies.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 308, § 2.